Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2154
Utilities district; energy conservation or weatherization programs; establish; powers.

A metropolitan utilities district may establish energy conservation or weatherization programs that will encourage and promote the efficient use of energy supplies. A metropolitan utilities district may enter into agreements with companies, service organizations, municipalities, political subdivisions, or state or federal agencies to establish or participate in such programs. Such participation may include the providing of administrative or other similar services from the district's separate gas utility for the support of such programs.

Laws 1983, LB 362, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1102.01;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 54.